tables/da-dk-g28_93.ctb
noback pass2 @f-1236 @12367
noback pass2 @f-6-1236 @6-12367
noback pass2 @f-5-1236 @5-12367
nofor pass2 @12367 @f-1236
nofor pass2 @5-12367 @f-5-1236

noback pass2 @f-2456 @24567
noback pass2 @f-6-2456 @6-24567
noback pass2 @f-5-2456 @5-24567
nofor pass2 @24567 @f-2456
nofor pass2 @5-24567 @f-5-2456
nofor pass2 @458-24567 @f-458-2456
nofor pass2 @458-5-24567 @f-458-5-2456

noback pass2 @f-1346 @13467
noback pass2 @f-6-1346 @6-13467
noback pass2 @f-5-1346 @5-13467
nofor pass2 @13467 @f-1346
nofor pass2 @5-13467 @f-5-1346
nofor pass2 @458-13467 @f-458-1346

noback pass2 @f-13456 @134567
noback pass2 @f-6-13456 @6-134567
noback pass2 @f-5-13456 @5-134567
nofor pass2 @134567 @f-13456
nofor pass2 @5-134567 @f-5-13456
nofor pass2 @458-134567 @f-458-13456

noback pass2 @f-1356 @13567
noback pass2 @f-6-1356 @6-13567
noback pass2 @f-5-1356 @5-13567
nofor pass2 @13567 @f-1356
nofor pass2 @5-13567 @f-5-1356
nofor pass2 @458-13567 @f-458-1356

noback pass2 @f-34 @347
noback pass2 @f-6-34 @6-347
noback pass2 @f-5-34 @5-347
nofor pass2 @347 @f-34
nofor pass2 @5-347 @f-5-34

noback pass2 @f-346 @3467
noback pass2 @f-6-346 @6-3467
noback pass2 @f-5-346 @5-3467
nofor pass2 @3467 @f-346
nofor pass2 @5-3467 @f-5-346

noback pass2 @f-2348 @23478
noback pass2 @f-6-2348 @6-23478
noback pass2 @f-5-2348 @5-23478
nofor pass2 @23478 @f-2348
nofor pass2 @5-23478 @f-5-2348

noback pass2 @f-1358 @13578
noback pass2 @f-6-1358 @6-13578
noback pass2 @f-5-1358 @5-13578
nofor pass2 @13578 @f-1358
nofor pass2 @5-13578 @f-5-1358

noback pass2 @f-234568 @2345678
noback pass2 @f-6-234568 @6-2345678
noback pass2 @f-5-234568 @5-2345678
nofor pass2 @2345678 @f-234568
nofor pass2 @5-2345678 @f-5-234568

noback pass2 @f-236 @2367
noback pass2 @f-6-236 @6-2367
noback pass2 @f-5-236 @5-2367
nofor pass2 @2367 @f-236
nofor pass2 @5-2367 @f-5-236

noback pass2 @f-256 @2567
noback pass2 @f-6-256 @6-2567
noback pass2 @f-5-256 @5-2567
nofor pass2 @2567 @f-256
nofor pass2 @5-2567 @f-5-256

noback pass2 @f-356 @3567
noback pass2 @f-6-356 @6-3567
noback pass2 @f-5-356 @5-3567
nofor pass2 @3567 @f-356
nofor pass2 @5-3567 @f-5-356

noback pass2 @f-3456 @34567
noback pass2 @f-6-3456 @6-34567
noback pass2 @f-5-3456 @5-34567
nofor pass2 @34567 @f-3456
nofor pass2 @5-34567 @f-5-3456

noback pass2 @f-12356 @123567
noback pass2 @f-6-12356 @6-123567
noback pass2 @f-5-12356 @5-123567
nofor pass2 @123567 @f-12356
nofor pass2 @5-123567 @f-5-12356

noback pass2 @f-123568 @1235678
noback pass2 @f-6-123568 @6-1235678
noback pass2 @f-5-123568 @5-1235678
nofor pass2 @1235678 @f-123568
nofor pass2 @5-1235678 @f-5-123568

noback pass2 @f-168 @1678
noback pass2 @f-6-168 @6-1678
noback pass2 @f-5-168 @5-1678
nofor pass2 @1678 @f-168
nofor pass2 @5-1678 @f-5-168

noback pass2 @f-1468 @14678
noback pass2 @f-6-1468 @6-14678
noback pass2 @f-5-1468 @5-14678
nofor pass2 @14678 @f-1468
nofor pass2 @5-14678 @f-5-1468

noback pass2 @f-3458 @34578
noback pass2 @f-6-3458 @6-34578
noback pass2 @f-5-3458 @5-34578
nofor pass2 @34578 @f-3458
nofor pass2 @5-34578 @f-5-3458

noback pass2 @f-16 @167
noback pass2 @f-6-16 @6-167
noback pass2 @f-5-16 @5-167
nofor pass2 @167 @f-16
nofor pass2 @5-167 @f-5-16

noback pass2 @f-345 @3457
noback pass2 @f-6-345 @6-3457
noback pass2 @f-5-345 @5-3457
nofor pass2 @3457 @f-345
nofor pass2 @5-3457 @f-5-345

noback pass2 @f-12346 @123467
noback pass2 @f-6-12346 @6-123467
noback pass2 @f-5-12346 @5-123467
nofor pass2 @123467 @f-12346
nofor pass2 @5-123467 @f-5-12346
nofor pass2 @458-123467 @f-458-12346

noback pass2 @f-2346 @23467
noback pass2 @f-6-2346 @6-23467
noback pass2 @f-5-2346 @5-23467
nofor pass2 @23467 @f-2346
nofor pass2 @5-23467 @f-5-2346

noback pass2 @f-123456 @1234567
noback pass2 @f-6-123456 @6-1234567
noback pass2 @f-5-123456 @5-1234567
nofor pass2 @1234567 @f-123456
nofor pass2 @5-1234567 @f-5-123456

noback pass2 @f-126 @1267
noback pass2 @f-6-126 @6-1267
noback pass2 @f-5-126 @5-1267
nofor pass2 @1267 @f-126
nofor pass2 @5-1267 @f-5-126

noback pass2 @f-1246 @12467
noback pass2 @f-6-1246 @6-12467
noback pass2 @f-5-1246 @5-12467
nofor pass2 @12467 @f-1246
nofor pass2 @5-12467 @f-5-1246

noback pass2 @f-1568 @15678
noback pass2 @f-6-1568 @6-15678
noback pass2 @f-5-1568 @5-15678
nofor pass2 @15678 @f-1568
nofor pass2 @5-15678 @f-5-1568

noback pass2 @f-1268 @12678
noback pass2 @f-6-1268 @6-12678
noback pass2 @f-5-1268 @5-12678
nofor pass2 @12678 @f-1268
nofor pass2 @5-12678 @f-5-1268

noback pass2 @f-146 @1467
noback pass2 @f-6-146 @6-1467
noback pass2 @f-5-146 @5-1467
nofor pass2 @1467 @f-146
nofor pass2 @5-1467 @f-5-146

noback pass2 @f-12456 @124567
noback pass2 @f-6-12456 @6-124567
noback pass2 @f-5-12456 @5-124567
nofor pass2 @124567 @f-12456
nofor pass2 @5-124567 @f-5-12456

noback pass2 @f-134568 @1345678
noback pass2 @f-6-134568 @6-1345678
noback pass2 @f-5-134568 @5-1345678
nofor pass2 @1345678 @f-134568
nofor pass2 @5-1345678 @f-5-134568

noback pass2 @f-124568 @1245678
noback pass2 @f-6-124568 @6-1245678
noback pass2 @f-5-124568 @5-1245678
nofor pass2 @1245678 @f-124568
nofor pass2 @5-1245678 @f-5-124568

noback pass2 @f-12468 @124678
noback pass2 @f-6-12468 @6-124678
noback pass2 @f-5-12468 @5-124678
nofor pass2 @124678 @f-12468
nofor pass2 @5-124678 @f-5-12468

noback pass2 @f-3468 @34678
noback pass2 @f-6-3468 @6-34678
noback pass2 @f-5-3468 @5-34678
nofor pass2 @34678 @f-3468
nofor pass2 @5-34678 @f-5-3468

noback pass2 @f-1456 @14567
noback pass2 @f-6-1456 @6-14567
noback pass2 @f-5-1456 @5-14567
nofor pass2 @14567 @f-1456
nofor pass2 @5-14567 @f-5-1456
nofor pass2 @458-14567 @f-458-1456

noback pass2 @f-14568 @145678
noback pass2 @f-6-14568 @6-145678
noback pass2 @f-5-14568 @5-145678
nofor pass2 @145678 @f-14568
nofor pass2 @5-145678 @f-5-14568

noback pass2 @f-2468 @24678
noback pass2 @f-6-2468 @6-24678
noback pass2 @f-5-2468 @5-24678
nofor pass2 @24678 @f-2468
nofor pass2 @5-24678 @f-5-2468

noback pass2 @f-246 @2467
noback pass2 @f-6-246 @6-2467
noback pass2 @f-5-246 @5-2467
nofor pass2 @2467 @f-246
nofor pass2 @5-2467 @f-5-246

noback pass2 @f-23456 @234567
noback pass2 @f-6-23456 @6-234567
noback pass2 @f-5-23456 @5-234567
nofor pass2 @234567 @f-23456
nofor pass2 @5-234567 @f-5-23456

noback pass2 @f-12568 @125678
noback pass2 @f-6-12568 @6-125678
noback pass2 @f-5-12568 @5-125678
nofor pass2 @125678 @f-12568
nofor pass2 @5-125678 @f-5-12568

noback pass2 @f-156 @1567
noback pass2 @f-6-156 @6-1567
noback pass2 @f-5-156 @5-1567
nofor pass2 @1567 @f-156
nofor pass2 @5-1567 @f-5-156
nofor pass2 @458-1567 @f-458-156
nofor pass2 @458-5-1567 @f-458-5-156

noback pass2 @f-1256 @12567
noback pass2 @f-6-1256 @6-12567
noback pass2 @f-5-1256 @5-12567
nofor pass2 @12567 @f-1256
nofor pass2 @5-12567 @f-5-1256

noback pass2 @f-1348 @13478
noback pass2 @f-6-1348 @6-13478
noback pass2 @f-5-1348 @5-13478
nofor pass2 @13478 @f-1348
nofor pass2 @5-13478 @f-5-1348

noback pass2 @f-138 @1378
noback pass2 @f-6-138 @6-1378
noback pass2 @f-5-138 @5-1378
nofor pass2 @1378 @f-138
nofor pass2 @5-1378 @f-5-138

noback pass2 @f-234568 @2345678
noback pass2 @f-6-234568 @6-2345678
noback pass2 @f-5-234568 @5-2345678
nofor pass2 @2345678 @f-234568
nofor pass2 @5-2345678 @f-5-234568

# Tweak to keep letsign for letters that should always have letsign.
# Letsign will be removed by the multind opcode. So we insert an extra one.
nofor pass2 @6-123457 @f-6-6-12345
nofor pass2 @6-24567 @f-6-6-2456
nofor pass2 @6-13467 @f-6-6-1346
nofor pass2 @6-134567 @f-6-6-13456
nofor pass2 @6-13567 @f-6-6-1356
nofor pass2 @6-123567 @f-6-6-12356
nofor pass2 @6-123467 @f-6-6-12346
nofor pass2 @6-23467 @f-6-6-2346
nofor pass2 @6-1234567 @f-6-6-123456
nofor pass2 @6-1267 @f-6-6-126
nofor pass2 @6-12467 @f-6-6-1246
nofor pass2 @6-1467 @f-6-6-146
nofor pass2 @6-124567 @f-6-6-12456
nofor pass2 @6-14567 @f-6-6-1456
nofor pass2 @6-234567 @f-6-6-23456
nofor pass2 @6-1567 @f-6-6-156
nofor pass2 @6-12567 @f-6-6-1256

# Ensure that punctuation signs etc. are not "tolowered" when they have a letsign, but only when they act as a partword contraction.
nofor pass2 @6-347 *
nofor pass2 @6-2357 *
nofor pass2 @6-3467 *
nofor pass2 @6-2567 *
nofor pass2 @6-2367 *
nofor pass2 @6-34567 *
nofor pass2 @6-367 *

# remove any superfluous capsletter marks.
noback pass2 @f ?

# Remove any superfluous letsigns and only keep one.
noback pass3 @6-6 @6

# Pass 3

# Remove letsigns before letters marked with indicator for accents or greek letters.

noback pass3 @6-5 @5
noback pass3 @6-458 @458

# Include hyphenation file as the last thing
include hyph_brl_da_dk_93.dic
